es: Tipo de ingredientes de perfumería: Absoluto; Químico aromático; Attar/Ittar; Extracto de CO2; Aceite esencial; Compuesto/mezcla de fragancias; Hidrosol; Oleorresina; Resinoide; Tintura; Otro
lt-LT: Parfumerijos ingrediento tipas: Absoliutas; Aromatinis chemikalas; Ataras; CO2 ekstraktas; Eterinis aliejus; Kvapų mišinys / kompozicija; Hidrolatas; Oleorezinas; Rezinoidas; Tinktūra; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de ingrediente de perfumaria: Absoluto; Químico aromático; Attar/Ittar; Extrato CO2; Óleo essencial; Composto/mistura de fragrâncias; Hidrolato; Oleorresina; Resinoide; Tintura; Outro
hu: Parfümipari összetevő típusa: Abszolútum; Aromakémiai anyag; Attar / ittar; CO2-kivonat; Illóolaj; Illatvegyület / keverék; Hidrolátum; Oleorezin; Rezinoid; Tinktúra; Egyéb
sv: Typ av parfymingrediens: Absolut; Aromakemikalie; Attar/Ittar; CO2-extrakt; Eterisk olja; Doftblandning; Hydrolat; Oleoresin; Resinoid; Tinktur; Övrigt
ja: 香水原料タイプ: アブソリュート; アロマケミカル; アター/イター; CO2 抽出物; エッセンシャルオイル; フレグランスコンパウンド/ブレンド; ハイドロゾル; オレオレジン; レジノイド; チンキ剤; その他
de: Art der Inhaltsstoffe für Düfte: Absolue; Aromachemikalie; Attar/Ittar; CO2-Extrakt; Ätherisches Öl; Duftstoffverbindung/Mischung; Hydrolat; Oleoresin; Resinoid; Tinktur; Sonstige
th: ประเภทส่วนผสมน้ำหอม: น้ำมันหอมระเหยแอบโซลูท; สารเคมีให้กลิ่นหอม; อัตตาร์/อิตตาร์; สารสกัดด้วย CO2; น้ำมันหอมระเหย; สารประกอบ/เบลนด์น้ำหอม; ไฮโดรซอล; โอลิโอเรซิน; เรซินอยด์; ทิงเจอร์; อื่นๆ
en: Perfumery ingredient type: Absolute; Aroma chemical; Attar/Ittar; CO2 extract; Essential oil; Fragrance compound/blend; Hydrosol; Oleoresin; Resinoid; Tincture; Other
pt-BR: Perfumaria, tipo de ingrediente: Absoluto; Produto químico aromático; Attar/Ittar; Extrato de CO2; Óleo essencial; Composto de fragrância/mistura; Hidrolato; Oleorresina; Resinoide; Tintura; Outro
zh-CN: 香料成分类型: 净油; 芳香化合物; 阿塔香油 (Attar/Ittar); CO2 提取物; 精油; 复合香料/混合香料; 纯露; 油树脂; 香树脂; 酊剂; 其他
pl: Typ składnika perfum: Absolut; Związek zapachowy; Attar; Ekstrakt CO2; Olejek eteryczny; Kompozycja zapachowa / mieszanka; Hydrolat; Oleorezyna; Rezynoid; Nalewka (tinktura); Inne
tr: Parfümeri bileşen türü: Absolit (Absolute); Aroma kimyasalı; Attar (İtar); CO2 ekstraktı; Uçucu yağ; Koku bileşimi/karışımı; Hidrosol; Oleoreçine; Rezinoid; Tentür; Diğer
zh-TW: 香料成分類型: 原精; 芳香化學物質; 阿塔香水 (Attar/Ittar); CO2 萃取物; 精油; 複合香料/調和香精; 純露; 油樹脂; 樹脂香精; 酊劑; 其他
nl: Type parfumingrediënt: Absolue; Aromachemische stof; Attar/ittar; CO2-extract; Etherische olie; Geurverbinding/mengsel; Hydrosol; Oleoresine; Resinoïde; Tinctuur; Overig
fr: Type d'ingrédient de parfumerie: Absolue; Molécule aromatique; Attar/Ittar; Extrait au CO2; Huile essentielle; Composé/mélange de parfum; Hydrolat; Oléorésine; Résinoïde; Teinture; Autre
el: Τύπος συστατικού αρωματοποιίας: Απόλυτο έλαιο (Absolute); Αρωματική χημική ένωση; Άτταρ (Attar/Ittar); Εκχύλισμα CO2; Αιθέριο έλαιο; Αρωματική ένωση/μείγμα; Ανθόνερο (Hydrosol); Ελαιορητίνη; Ρητινοειδές; Βάμμα; Άλλο
fi: Hajuveden ainesosatyyppi: Absoluutti; Aromikemikaali; Attar/Ittar; CO2-uute; Eteerinen öljy; Tuoksuyhdiste/-sekoitus; Hydrosoli; Oleoresiini; Resinoidi; Tinktuura; Muu
sl-SI: Vrsta sestavine za izdelavo parfuma: Absolut; Aromatična kemikalija; Attar/ittar; Izvleček CO2; Eterično olje; Dišavna spojina/mešanica; Hidrosol; Oleoresin; Resinoid; Tinktura; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ prísady do parfumu: Absolútna esencia; Aromatická chemikália; Attar/Ittar; CO2 extrakt; Esenciálny olej; Vonná zmes/kompozícia; Hydrosól; Oleorezín; Rezinoid; Tinktúra; Iné
nb: Type parfymeingrediens: Absolutt; Aromakjemikalie; Attar/ittar; CO2-ekstrakt; Eterisk olje; Duftblanding; Hydrosol; Oleoresin; Resinoid; Tinktur; Annet
ko: 향수 성분 유형: 앱솔루트; 아로마 케미컬; 아타르/이타르; CO2 추출물; 에센셜 오일; 프래그런스 컴파운드/블렌드; 하이드로졸; 올레오레진; 레지노이드; 팅크처; 기타
ro-RO: Tip de ingredient de parfumerie: Absolut; Aromă chimică; Attar/Ittar; Extract CO2; Ulei esențial; Compus/amestec de parfum; Hidrosol; Oleorășină; Rezinoid; Tinctură; Altele
it: Tipo di ingrediente per profumeria: Assoluta; Sostanza chimica aromatica; Attar/Ittar; Estratto CO2; Olio essenziale; Composto/miscela di fragranze; Idrolato; Oleoresina; Resinoide; Tintura; Altro
bg-BG: Тип парфюмерийна съставка: Абсолют; Аромахимикал; Атар/Итар; CO2 екстракт; Етерично масло; Ароматна смес/бленд; Хидрозол; Олеорезин; Резиноид; Тинктура; Друг
hr-HR: Vrsta sastojka u parfumeriji: Apsolut; Aromatska kemikalija; Attar/Ittar; CO2 ekstrakt; Eterično ulje; Mirisni spoj/mješavina; Hidrolat; Oleorezina; Rezinoid; Tinktura; Ostalo
ru: Тип парфюмерного ингредиента: Абсолют; Синтетическое душистое вещество; Аттар/иттар; СО2-экстракт; Эфирное масло; Парфюмерная композиция/смесь; Гидролат; Олеорезин; Резиноид; Тинктура (настойка); Другое
cs: Typ parfémové složky: Absolutum; Aromatická chemikálie; Attar/Ittar; CO2 extrakt; Esenciální olej; Vonná směs; Hydrolát; Oleoresin; Rezinoid; Tinktura; Ostatní
da: Type af parfumeingrediens: Absolut; Aromakemikalie; Attar/Ittar; CO2-ekstrakt; Æterisk olie; Duftblanding; Hydrosol; Oleoresin; Resinoid; Tinktur; Andet
vi: Loại thành phần nước hoa: Absolute; Hóa chất tạo mùi; Attar/Ittar; Chiết xuất CO2; Tinh dầu; Hợp chất/hỗn hợp hương liệu; Nước cất (Hydrosol); Nhựa dầu (Oleoresin); Resinoid; Cồn thuốc; Khác